Utah statutes.
63M-7-304.   Chair -- Vacancies -- Quorum -- Expenses.

(1)  The members of each committee established by the council shall annually select a chair or co-chairs from among the members of the committee.

(2)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term in the same manner as the position was originally filled.

(3)  A majority of the members of a committee constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business by the committee.

(4)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Amended by Chapter 39, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session

